New York, session 2025-2026, A4850.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "New York state teleworking expansion act". 3 § 2. The civil service law is amended by adding a new section 13 to 4 read as follows: 5 § 13. Teleworking programs. 1. Each state agency shall establish a 6 policy and program to allow employees to perform all or a portion of 7 their duties through teleworking to the maximum extent possible without 8 diminished employee performance. Each state agency shall designate a 9 "telework coordinator" to be responsible for overseeing the implementa- 10 tion of teleworking programs. 11 2. For the purposes of this section, the term: 12 (a) "telework" shall mean to perform normal and regular work functions 13 on a workday that ordinarily would be performed at the state agency's 14 principal location at a different location, thereby eliminating or 15 substantially reducing the physical commute to and from such state agen- 16 cy's principal location; and 17 (b) "state agency" shall mean any state department, board, bureau, 18 division, commission, committee, public authority, public benefit corpo- 19 ration, council, office, or other governmental entity performing a 20 governmental or proprietary function for the state. 21 3. No agency shall establish a policy pursuant to this section for any 22 employee that is subject to a collective bargaining agreement unless 23 such policy has been mutually agreed to between the agency and the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02899-01-5 A. 4850 2 1 employee organization that is certified or recognized to represent such 2 employees, within the meaning of article fourteen of this chapter, 3 pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement. 4 § 3. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 5 have become a law.